Nevada, session 83, SB5.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Section 20 of chapter 240, Statutes of Nevada 2021,
as amended by chapter 447, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 2743,
is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 20. 1. This section becomes effective upon
passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 19, inclusive, of this act [:
(a) Become] become effective:
[(1)] (a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of
adopting any regulations and performing any other
preparatory administrative tasks that are necessary to carry
out the provisions of this act; and
[(2)] (b) On July 1, 2021, for all other purposes.
[(b) Expire by limitation on June 30, 2025.]
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB5*